Tennessee, session 114, HB1059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1510, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) A person who sells a vapor product to another person who has not attained
twenty-one (21) years of age in violation of § 39-17-1504(a) commits a Class C
misdemeanor and, notwithstanding § 40-35-111, shall be punished by a maximum fine
of five hundred dollars ($500).
(b) A person commits a Class C misdemeanor who violates:
(1) § 39-17-1504, other than selling a vapor product to another person
who has not attained twenty-one (21) years of age;
(2) § 39-17-1506;
(3) § 39-17-1507; or
(4) § 39-17-1508.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to any offense committed on or after that date.
HB1059
003204
- 1 -